Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
Haystack TV Terms Of Service
Acceptance of Terms of Use
The terms of this agreement (the “Terms of Use”), which include our
Privacy Policy
, govern the relationship between you and Haystack TV, Inc. (hereinafter referred to as “Haystack”, “us” or “we”) regarding your use the Haystack service, including all features and functionalities, user interfaces, and all content, applications and software associated therewith (hereinafter the “Service”). By using, visiting, using, or browsing the Service you accept and agree to be bound by these Terms of Use.
If you do not agree to any of the provisions set forth, you should not use the Service.
Any references to “you” or “your” refer to you, as a user of the Service. References to “we”, “us” and “our” refer to Haystack.
You must be at least 13 years old to use the Services. By using the Services, you represent and warrant that you are at least 13 years old.
If you are under 18, you represent that you have your parent or guardian’s permission to use the Service. Please have them read this Agreement with you.
If you are a parent or legal guardian of a user under the age of 18, by allowing your child to use the Service, you are subject to the terms of this Agreement and responsible for your child’s activity on the Service.
Changes to Terms of Use
Haystack reserves the right to change, alter, replace or otherwise modify these Terms of Use at any time, including the Privacy Policy, by posting the amended Terms of Use on or within the Service. You may also be given additional notice, such as an e-mail message or a notification within the Service, of any changes. You will be deemed to have accepted such changes by continuing to use the Service. Except as otherwise stated, all amended terms shall automatically be effective 30 days after they are initially posted.
How the Haystack Service Works
Haystack is an online media service and community whereby users (hereinafter “Users”) may (i) access and view certain textual and audio-visual content (the “Content”) and (ii) curate which Content is presented or displayed to the User based on the User’s interests.
We may, from time to time, release new tools and resources, release new versions of the Service, or introduce other services and/or features. Any new services and features will be subject to these Terms of Use as well as any additional terms of use that we may release for those specific services or features.
Your Haystack Account
To access certain Services, you must create a user profile (the “User Profile”) with a unique device ID, through your email, or by connecting either your Facebook, Google, Apple, Roku, Amazon or other Third Party account (each a “Third Party Platform”). Such Third Party Platforms will provide us with certain additional information about you, which may include, without limitation, your email address, legal name, country of residence and location, all as more fully described herein, including in the
Privacy Policy
. After registering with us, you are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your account credentials and for restricting access to your computer. Moreover, you agree to accept responsibility for all activities that occur in your account.
We may provide automatic service alerts and account-related alerts. You can modify your communication preference at any time. Account–related alerts are sent to you as part of Haystack's service. Alerts will be sent to you via push notification alerts to your mobile and web devices, and/or to the email address you have provided as your primary email address for Haystack. Text notifications may also be available to you in the future. If your email address changes, you are responsible for informing us of that change. Anyone with access to your email will be able to view the content of these alerts. At any time you may disable future alerts.
We reserve the right to disallow, cancel, remove or reassign certain usernames and permalinks in appropriate circumstances, as determined by us in our sole discretion, and may, with or without prior notice, suspend or terminate your account if activities occur on that account which, in our sole discretion, would or might constitute a violation of these Terms of Use, or an infringement or violation of the rights of any third party, or of any applicable laws or regulations.
You may terminate your account at any time as described in the Termination section below. Furthermore, we reserve the right to terminate or restrict your use of the Service, without notice, for any or no reason whatsoever.
Haystack TV Premium
You may subscribe to Haystack TV Premium for ad-free access to the Service by paying a monthly or annual fee. Additional Terms may apply to your use of, access to and purchase of such fee-based products or services and such Additional Terms are incorporated herein by reference. Please note that "Ad-free" means that we strive to remove commercial interruptions from content that we directly license or control from content providers who consented to make their content services ad-free. However, we do not guarantee the complete absence of advertisements, regardless of your subscription tier, live or special events, replays of such content, or other licensed programming, which may include advertisements or sponsorships due to rights agreements or technical limitations.
From time to time, Premium may include brief promotional messages regarding our service, upgrades, or related offerings.
You may only purchase such fee-based subscription if, and you hereby represent, warrant and agree that (a) you are 18 years of age or older and (b) you shall pay in full the prices and fees (including, without limitation, all applicable taxes) for any purchases you, or anyone using your User Profile, make via credit card, PayPal or other payment means acceptable to Haystack concurrent with your online order. If payment is not received by us from your credit card issuer or its agents or other payment service provider, you agree to promptly pay all amounts due upon demand by us. Haystack may revise any or all of the fees and prices associated with the fee-based subscription at any time for any or no reason. Further, Haystack does not guarantee that content and products will be available, accurate, complete, reliable, current or error-free. Descriptions and images of, and references to, products or services do not imply our or any of our affiliates’ endorsement of such products or services. Moreover, Haystack and its third party operational service providers reserve the right, with or without prior notice, for any or no reason, to change product descriptions, images, and references; to limit the available quantity of any product; to honor, or impose conditions on the honoring of, any coupon, coupon code, promotional code or other similar promotions; to bar any user from conducting any or all transaction(s); and/or to refuse to provide any User with any product. Further, if Haystack terminates your use of or registration to the Service because you have breached these Terms of Use, you shall not be entitled to a refund of any unused portion of any fees, payments or other consideration.
You may cancel your Haystack TV Premium subscription at any time via your Account Settings or through the App Store where you purchased, however you shall not be entitled to a refund of any subscription fees paid up until the point of cancellation.
Your Use of the Service
Subject to your strict compliance with these Terms of Use, Haystack grants you a limited, personal, non-exclusive, revocable, non-assignable and non-transferable right and license to use the Service to access the Content.
The above license is conditional upon your strict compliance with these Terms of Use, including, without limitation, the following:
You must not copy, rip or capture, or attempt to copy, rip or capture, any Content from the Service.
You must not adapt, copy, republish, make available or otherwise communicate to the public, display, perform, transfer, share, distribute or otherwise use or exploit any Content on or from the Service, except as permitted under these Terms of Use, and within the parameters set by the Service.
You must not use any in any way that is designed to create a separate content service or that replicates any part of the Service offering.
You must not employ scraping or similar techniques to aggregate, repurpose, republish or otherwise make use of any Content.
You must not employ any techniques or make use of any services, automated or otherwise, designed to misrepresent your activity on the Service, including without limitation by the use of bots, botnets, scripts, apps, plugins, extensions or other automated means to register accounts, log in, play Content, or otherwise to act on your behalf, particularly where such activity occurs in a multiple or repetitive fashion. You must not offer or promote the availability of any such techniques or services to any other users of the Service.
You must not alter or remove, attempt to alter or remove, any trademark, copyright or other proprietary or legal notices contained in, or appearing on, the Service or any Content appearing on the Service.
You must not, and must not permit any third party to, copy or adapt the object code of the Service, or reverse engineer, reverse assemble, decompile, modify or attempt to discover any source or object code of any part of the Service, or circumvent or attempt to circumvent or copy any copy protection mechanism or access any rights management information pertaining to Content.
You must not use the Service to upload, post, store, host, transmit, display, copy, distribute, promote, make available or otherwise communicate to the public:
any Content that is offensive, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, racist, sexually explicit, ethnically or culturally offensive, indecent, that promotes violence, terrorism, or illegal acts, incites hatred on grounds of race, gender, religion or sexual orientation, or is otherwise objectionable in Haystack’s reasonable discretion;
any information, Content or other material that violates, plagiarizes, misappropriates or infringes the rights of third parties including, without limitation, copyright, trademark rights, rights of privacy or publicity, confidential information or any other right;
any Content that violates, breaches or is contrary to any law, rule, regulation, court order or is otherwise is illegal or unlawful in Haystack’s reasonable opinion;
any material of any kind that contains any virus, Trojan horse, spyware, adware, malware, bot, time bomb, worm, or other harmful or malicious component, which or might overburden, impair or disrupt the Service or servers or networks forming part of, or connected to, the Service, or which does or might restrict or inhibit any other user’s use and enjoyment of the Service; or
any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional messages, spam or any other form of solicitation.
You must not commit or engage in, or encourage, induce, solicit or promote, any conduct that would constitute a criminal offence, give rise to civil liability or otherwise violate any law or regulation.
You must not rent, sell or lease access to the Service, or any Content on the Service.
You must not deliberately impersonate any person or entity or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with a person or entity, for example, by registering an account in the name of another person or company, or sending messages or making comments using the name of another person.
You must not stalk, exploit, threaten, abuse or otherwise harass another person, including but not limited to any user, or any Haystack employee.
You must not use or attempt to use another person's account, password, or other information, unless you have express permission from that other person.
You must not sell or transfer, or offer to sell or transfer, any Haystack account to any third party without the prior written approval of Haystack.
You must not collect or attempt to collect personal data, or any other kind of information about other users, including without limitation, through spidering or any form of scraping.
You must not violate, circumvent or attempt to violate or circumvent any data security measures employed by Haystack; access or attempt to access data or materials which are not intended for your use; log into, or attempt to log into, a server or account which you are not authorized to access; attempt to scan or test the vulnerability of Haystack’s servers, system or network or attempt to breach Haystack’s data security or authentication procedures; attempt to interfere with the Service by any means including, without limitation, hacking Haystack’s servers or systems, submitting a virus, overloading, mail-bombing or crashing. Without limitation to any other rights or remedies of Haystack under these Terms of Use, Haystack reserves the right to investigate any situation that appears to involve any of the above, and may report such matters to, and co-operate with, appropriate law enforcement authorities in prosecuting any users who have participated in any such violations.
You agree to comply with the above conditions, and acknowledge and agree that Haystack has the right, in its sole discretion, to terminate your account or take such other action as we see fit if you breach any of the above conditions or any of the other terms of these Terms of Use. This may include taking court action and/or reporting offending users to the relevant authorities.
Quality of Content
The quality of streaming content may differ depending on the device and can be influenced by various factors, such as your internet speed and location. Some live feed content may experience a slight delay and could occasionally be edited or temporarily paused. Haystack makes no representations or warranties regarding the quality of your viewing experience on your device.
Explicit Content
Some of the Content may be considered inappropriate for those under the age of 18. Parental discretion is advised for all users of the services under the age of 18.
Copyright Infringement
The Haystack service, including all Content included on the Service and user interfaces, or delivered to Users as part of the service, including, but not limited to, text, graphics, logos, designs, photographs, button icons, images, audio/video clips, digital downloads, data compilations, and software, are the property of either Haystack or its licensors, as applicable, and are protected by United States and international copyright, trade secret or other intellectual property laws and treaties. Content shall not be reproduced or used without express written permission from Haystack or its licensors, as applicable.
Haystack reserves the right to terminate your membership hereunder if Haystack, in its sole and absolute discretion, believes that you are in violation of Haystack’s restrictions against unauthorized copying or use of our proprietary content in violation of the copyrights of Haystack or its licensors, as applicable. Haystack does not promote, foster or condone any infringing activity. The use of the Haystack service, including Content made available to you by us, is solely for your personal and non-commercial use.
If you discover any Content on the Service that you believe infringes your copyright, please provide written notification to us which includes the following information: (1) a statement that you have identified the Content on Haystack that infringes your copyright or the copyright of a third party on whose behalf you are entitled to act; (2) a description of the copyrighted work(s) that you claim have been infringed, (3) a description of the Content that you claim is infringing and a description of where such Content can be located, (4) your full name, address and telephone number, a valid email address at which you can be contacted, and your Haystack user name, if any, (5) a statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use of the material is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law, and (6) a statement by you that the information in your notice is accurate and that you are authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the exclusive right that is allegedly infringed. In addition, if you wish for your notice to be considered as a notice pursuant to the United States Digital Millennium Copyright Act 17 U.S.C. §512(c), please also include the following: (1) with respect to your statement that you are authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the exclusive right that is allegedly infringed, confirmation that such statement is made under penalty of perjury; and (2) your electronic or physical signature (which may be a scanned copy). Your notice should be sent to us by email to
dmca@haystack.tv
. You may also contact us by mail at:
Attention: Copyright Agent
Haystack TV, Inc
95 3rd St
2nd Floor
San Francisco, CA 94103
Blocking and Removal of Content
Notwithstanding the fact that Haystack has no legal obligation to monitor the Content on the Service, Haystack reserves the right to block, remove or delete any Content at any time at its sole discretion, and to limit or restrict access to any Content, for any reason and without liability, including without limitation, if we have reason to believe that such Content does or might infringe the rights of any third party, has been uploaded or posted in breach of these Terms of Use or applicable law, or is otherwise unacceptable to Haystack.
Third Party Websites, Services and Services
The Service may provide you with access to third party websites, databases, networks, servers, information, software, programs, systems, directories, Services, or products or services (hereinafter “External Services”).
Haystack does not have or maintain any control over External Services, and is not and cannot be responsible for their content, operation or use. By linking or otherwise displaying information from or providing access to any External Services, Haystack does not give any representation, warranty or endorsement, express or implied, with respect to the legality, accuracy, quality or authenticity of content, information or services provided by such External Services.
External Services may have their own terms of use and/or privacy policy, and may have different practices and requirements to those operated by Haystack with respect to the Service. You are solely responsible for reviewing any terms of use, privacy policy or other terms governing your use of these External Services, which you use at your own risk. You are advised to make reasonable enquiries and investigations before entering into any transaction, financial or otherwise, and whether online or offline, with any third party related to any External Services.
You are solely responsible for taking the precautions necessary to protect yourself from fraud when using External Services, and to protect your computer systems from viruses, worms, Trojan horses, and other harmful or destructive content and material that may be included on or may emanate from any External Services. Haystack disclaims any and all responsibility or liability for any harm resulting from your use of External Services, and you hereby irrevocably waive any claim against Haystack with respect to the content or operation of any External Services.
Advertisements
From time to time, you may choose to communicate or interact with, or obtain External Services of or from, advertisers, sponsors, or promotional partners (collectively, the “Advertisers”) found on or through the Service or a hyperlinked site, service or platform. All such communication, interaction and participation is strictly and solely between you and such Advertisers and we shall not be responsible or liable to you in any way in connection with these activities or transactions (including, without limitation, any representations, warranties, covenants, contracts or other terms or conditions that may exist between you and the Advertisers or any goods or services you may purchase or obtain from any Advertiser).
Termination
You may terminate this Agreement at any time by emailing us at
feedback@haystack.tv
with a request to delete your User Profile, and thereafter ceasing to use the Service. Simply deleting the Service from your mobile or television device will not effectively terminate this Agreement.
Haystack may suspend your access to the Service and/or terminate this Agreement at any time if (i) you are deemed to be a repeat copyright infringer; (ii) you are in breach of any of the material provision of these Terms of Use; (iii) Haystack elects at its discretion to cease providing access to the Service in the jurisdiction where you reside or from where you are attempting to access the Service, or (iv) in other reasonable circumstances as determined by Haystack at its discretion.
Once your account has been terminated, any and all Content residing in your account, or pertaining to activity from your account, may be irretrievably deleted by Haystack, except to the extent that we are obliged or permitted to retain such Content, data or information for a certain period of time in accordance with applicable laws and regulations and/or to protect our legitimate business interests. You are advised to save or back up any material that you have uploaded to your account before terminating your account, as Haystack assumes no liability for any material that is irretrievably deleted following any termination of your account.
The provisions of these Terms of Use that are intended by their nature to survive the termination or cancellation of this Agreement will survive the termination of this Agreement.
Disclaimers of Warranties and Limitations on Liability
THE HAYSTACK SERVICE, INCLUDING THE APPLICATION AND USER INTERFACES, AND ALL CONTENT AND SOFTWARE ASSOCIATED THEREWITH, OR ANY OTHER FEATURES OR FUNCTIONALITIES ASSOCIATED WITH THE HAYSTACK SERVICE, ARE PROVIDED "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE" WITH ALL FAULTS AND WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WE AND OUR LICENSORS MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND WITH RESPECT TO THE HAYSTACK SERVICE, THE SERVICE AND USER INTERFACES, AND ALL CONTENT AND SOFTWARE ASSOCIATED THEREWITH. HAYSTACK DOES NOT GUARANTEE, REPRESENT, OR WARRANT THAT YOUR USE OF THE HAYSTACK SERVICE WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED OR ERROR-FREE, AND YOU AGREE THAT HAYSTACK MAY ELIMINATE OR OTHERWISE MODIFY ANY OR ALL ASPECTS OF THE HAYSTACK SERVICE, INCLUDING FEATURES, WITHOUT COMPENSATION OR NOTICE TO YOU. Without limiting the foregoing, we and our licensors assume no liability or responsibility for any of the following: (i) errors or omissions in the Content delivered by the Haystack service or on the Service or user interfaces; (ii) recommendations or advice of Haystack customer service representatives; (iii) any failure or interruption in the availability of the Haystack service and/or website or user interfaces, (iv) delivery and or display of any Content contained on the Service, user interfaces, or otherwise through the Haystack service; and (v) any losses or damages arising from the use of the Content provided on the Service, user interfaces, or otherwise through the Haystack service itself, including any losses or damages arising from downloading of related software, downloading and/or use of any other software, including the remote desktop tool offered by Haystack’s customer service representatives, optical media discs or any conduct by users of the Haystack service, the Service or user interfaces. TO THE EXTENT ALLOWABLE BY LAW, WE AND OUR LICENSORS DISCLAIM ALL REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, FOR EXAMPLE, WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, SATISFACTORY QUALITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. In addition, we do not represent or warrant that the information accessible via the Service is accurate, complete or current. We do not make any representations with respect to the Content or the descriptions of any Content contained on the Service and user interfaces. We do not represent or guarantee that your use of the Haystack service will be free from interruption, loss, corruption, attack, viruses, interference, hacking, or other security intrusion and we disclaim any liability with respect thereto. No oral or written information or advice given by us or our authorized representative shall create a warranty or otherwise constitute a representation binding upon Haystack or its affiliated parties.
IN NO EVENT SHALL HAYSTACK, OR ITS SUBSIDIARIES OR ANY OF THEIR SHAREHOLDERS, DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES OR LICENSORS BE LIABLE (JOINTLY OR SEVERALLY) TO YOU FOR PERSONAL INJURY OR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, INDIRECT OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, OR ANY DAMAGES WHATSOEVER RESULTING FROM LOSS OF USE, DATA OR PROFITS, BUSINESS INTERRUPTION OR ANY OTHER COMMERCIAL DAMAGES OR LOSS, WHETHER OR NOT ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF DAMAGE, AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE USE OR PERFORMANCE OF THE HAYSTACK SERVICE, THE SERVICE AND USER INTERFACES, AND ALL CONTENTS AND SOFTWARE ASSOCIATED THEREWITH, OR OTHERWISE RELATED TO THE HAYSTACK SERVICE. IF ANY APPLICABLE AUTHORITY HOLDS ANY PORTION OF THIS SECTION OR OTHER SECTIONS OF THESE TERMS OF USE, INCLUDING ANY PORTION OF THE PRIVACY POLICY, TO BE UNENFORCEABLE, THEN THOSE PORTIONS DEEMED UNENFORCEABLE SHALL BE SEVERED AND THE TERMS OF USE SHALL BE ENFORCED ABSENT THOSE PROVISIONS AND ANY LIABILITY WILL BE LIMITED TO ONE DOLLAR (U.S. $1.00) OR THE FULLEST POSSIBLE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
Indemnification
You hereby agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Haystack, its successors, assigns, affiliates, agents, directors, officers, employees and shareholders from and against any and all claims, obligations, damages, losses, expenses, and costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs, resulting from: (1) any violation by you of these Terms of Use; and (2) any activity related to your account, be it by you or by any other person accessing your account with or without your consent unless such activity was caused by the act or default of Haystack.
Assignment to Third Parties
Haystack may assign, license, or sub-license its rights and (where permissible by law) its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, to any third party at any time without notice, including without limitation, to any person or entity acquiring all or substantially all of the assets or business of Haystack. You may not assign this Agreement or the rights and duties hereunder, in whole or in part, to any third party without the prior written consent of Haystack.
Severability
Should one or more provisions of these Terms of Use be found to be unlawful, void or unenforceable, such provision(s) shall be deemed severable and will not affect the validity and/or enforceability of the remaining provisions of the Terms of Use, which will remain in full force and effect.
Entire Agreement
These Terms of Use, together with the Privacy Policy, constitute the entire agreement between you and Haystack with respect to your use of the Service and supersede any prior agreement between you and Haystack. Any modifications to this Agreement must be made in writing.
Arbitration Agreement
You and Haystack agree that any dispute, claim or controversy arising out of or relating in any way to the Haystack service, including our website, user interfaces, and these Terms of Use, shall be determined by binding arbitration instead of in courts of general jurisdiction. Arbitration is more informal than a lawsuit in court. Arbitration uses a neutral arbitrator instead of a judge or jury, allows for more limited discovery than in court, and is subject to very limited review by courts. Arbitrators can award the same damages and relief that a court can award. You agree that, by agreeing to these Terms of Use, the U.S. Federal Arbitration Act governs the interpretation and enforcement of this provision, and that you and Haystack are each waiving the right to a trial by jury or to participate in a class action. This arbitration provision shall survive termination of this Agreement and the termination of your use of the Service.
If you elect to seek arbitration, you must first send to Haystack, by certified mail, a written Notice of your claim (“Notice”). If Haystack elects to seek arbitration, it will send a written Notice to the email address used for your membership account. A Notice, whether sent by you or by Haystack, must (a) describe the nature and basis of the claim or dispute; and (b) set forth the specific relief sought (“Demand”). If Haystack and you do not reach an agreement to resolve the claim within 30 days after the Notice is received, you or Haystack may commence an arbitration proceeding or file a claim in small claims court. During the arbitration, the amount of any settlement offer made by Haystack or you shall not be disclosed to the arbitrator. You may download or copy a form Notice and a form to initiate arbitration at www.adr.org. The arbitration will be governed by the Commercial Arbitration Rules and the Supplementary Procedures for Consumer Related Disputes (collectively, "AAA Rules") of the American Arbitration Association ("AAA"), as modified by this Agreement, and will be administered by the AAA. The AAA Rules and Forms are available online at www.adr.org, by calling the AAA at 1-800-778-7879, or by writing to Haystack. The arbitrator is bound by the terms of this Agreement. All issues are for the arbitrator to decide, including issues relating to the scope and enforceability of this arbitration agreement. Unless Haystack and you agree otherwise, any arbitration hearings will take place in the county (or parish) of your billing address. (If you reside outside of the United States, any arbitration hearings will take place in your country of residence at a location reasonably convenient to you, but will remain subject to the AAA Rules including the AAA rules regarding the selection of an arbitrator). If your claim is for US$10,000 or less, we agree that you may choose whether the arbitration will be conducted solely on the basis of documents submitted to the arbitrator, through a telephonic hearing, or by an in-person hearing as established by the AAA Rules. If your claim exceeds US$10,000, the right to a hearing will be determined by the AAA Rules. Regardless of the manner in which the arbitration is conducted, the arbitrator shall issue a reasoned written decision sufficient to explain the essential findings and conclusions on which the award is based. If the arbitrator issues you an award that is greater than the value of Haystack’s last written settlement offer made before an arbitrator was selected (or if Haystack did not make a settlement offer before an arbitrator was selected), then Haystack will pay you the amount of the award or US$1,000, whichever is greater. Except as expressly set forth herein, the payment of all filing, administration and arbitrator fees will be governed by the AAA Rules.
YOU AND HAYSTACK AGREE THAT EACH MAY BRING CLAIMS AGAINST THE OTHER ONLY IN YOUR OR ITS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING. Further, unless both you and Haystack agree otherwise, the arbitrator may not consolidate more than one person's claims with your claims, and may not otherwise preside over any form of a representative or class proceeding. If this specific provision is found to be unenforceable, then the entirety of this arbitration provision shall be null and void. The arbitrator may award declaratory or injunctive relief only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief warranted by that party's individual claim.
Governing Law
These Terms of Use shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, U.S.A. without regard to conflict of laws provisions. The exclusive jurisdiction and venue for any action, suit or proceeding based upon any matter arising hereunder or relating hereto shall be in the state or federal courts located in the State of California. If any provision or provisions of these terms shall be held to be invalid, illegal, unenforceable or in conflict with the law of any jurisdiction, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby, and shall remain in full force and effect.
Haystack TV Privacy Policy
Last modified: December 4, 2024
Welcome to Haystack, a service provided by Haystack TV, Inc. (hereinafter “Haystack”, “us” or “we”). Haystack knows that you care about how your personally identifiable information is used and shared, and we take your privacy seriously. Personally identifiable information is information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer, household, or device (hereinafter “Personal Information”). Personal information does not include publicly available information from government records or deidentified or aggregated consumer information. This privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, store, use, and disclose your Personal Information when you use our website, applications (across all platforms, including mobile, desktop, television, etc.), and any other linked pages, features, or content, including all features and functionalities, user interfaces, and all content and software associated therewith (hereinafter collectively, the “Service”).
This Privacy Policy covers Haystack’s treatment of Personal Information that Haystack gathers when you are accessing textual and/or media content (the “Content”) and/or using our Service. This policy does not apply to the practices of companies that Haystack does not own or control, or to individuals that Haystack does not employ or manage. When using this Service, you may find links to other websites, apps and services, or tools that enable you to share information with other websites, apps and services. Haystack is not responsible for the privacy practices of these other websites, apps and services and we recommend that you review the privacy policies of each of these websites, apps or services before connecting your Haystack account or sharing any Personal Information.
By using our applications, or in any other way using the Service you acknowledge that you accept the use of your Personal Information and the practices and policies outlined in this Privacy Policy.
Please take the time to read this Privacy Policy and make sure you are content with our use and disclosure of your Personal Information.
If you do not agree to any of the provisions of this Privacy Policy, you should not use the Service.
If you have questions or concerns, you can contact us at
contact@haystack.tv
.
User Age Restrictions
Haystack is not intended for use by children. Anyone under the age of 18 is not permitted to use the Service and must not attempt to register an account or submit any Personal Information to us. We do not knowingly collect any Personal Information from any person who is under the age of 18 or allow them to register an account. If it comes to our attention that we have collected Personal Information from a person under the age of 18, we will delete this information as quickly as possible. If you have reason to believe that we may have collected any such data, please notify use immediately at
contact@haystack.tv
.
What Personal Information Does Haystack Collect?
The Personal Information we gather from our Users enables us to personalize and improve our services and to allow our Users to set up a user profile (“User Profile”) if they wish to do so. We collect the following types of information from our Users:
Personal Information You Provide to Use
In order to create a User Profile you must connect through third party platforms, such as through your Facebook or your Google account (each a “Third Party Platform”). Such Third Party Platforms will provide us with information about you described in Personal Information Collected From Other Sources below. Furthermore, in the event that you opt in to a Haystack TV Premium subscription, you will also be required to either (i) provide credit card information and a valid billing address or (ii) link your User Profile to your Google Pay, Apple Pay, or PayPal account.
You may choose, at your discretion, to provide additional Personal Information to Haystack, such as your interests. This information is not mandatory, and any information you provide may be deleted, edited, amended, or changed at any time. For more information, please see the Access, Choice and Control section below.
You will also provide certain Personal Information if you open an email or similar digital communication from Haystack, or contact us via email or other communication (including, but not limited to, mail, fax, phone, or other offline means). Haystack uses this information to make our communications more interesting and helpful and to improve our Service. If you do not wish to receive email or other communications from us, please see the Access, Choice and Control section below.
Personal Information Collected Automatically
We receive and store certain types of information as a result of your interaction with our Service, or through the use of web analytics services as described in our Cookies and Similar Technology section. Haystack automatically receives and records information on our server logs from your browser including:
The Internet Protocol (“IP”) address of the device from which you access the Service (which can sometimes be used to derive the country or city from which you are accessing the Service);
Information collected through cookies and similar technology;
The page you requested and the page that you visited immediately prior to visiting the Service;
The specific actions you take on the Service and any search terms you may enter on the Service;
The time, frequency, and duration of your visits to the Service;
Your browser type, operating system and mobile provider;
The nature of the device from which you are accessing the Service, for example, whether you are accessing from a personal computer or from a mobile device; and
Information regarding your interaction with messages, for example, whether you opened, clicked on, or forwarded the message.
Personal Information Collected From Other Sources
In the event you connect your accounts from a Third Party Platform, such as Facebook or Google, to the Service, then we will receive certain information, which information may be used to instantly personalize your account with the Service. The information that Haystack may access, collect and store may include the following, among other information, as allowed by you, by the third party API (for example, Facebook’s API):
Your name
Your profile picture
Your email address
Your gender
Your birthday
Your location
The names and pictures of your friends, followers, persons you follow, pages you like, or other connections on such third party site.
Your interests and affinity networks.
Other information you make publicly available on such third party site.
The privacy practices of Third Party Platforms are not governed by this Privacy Notice. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of these third-party websites and services to understand their practices.
Cookies and Similar Technology
Like many services, we use cookies and tracking pixels. Cookies are a service or website’s way of remembering who you are. A cookie is a small text file that is stored on your device’s hard drive or stored temporarily in your device’s memory. There are two kinds of cookies: those that are “session” oriented and those that are “persistent.” Session cookies delete from your device when you close your browser. Persistent cookies retain information for later use tomorrow, next week, next month, or whenever they are set to expire. We use cookies to help us to identify Users and to optimize their experience on our Service. We may also use cookies in order to deliver targeted advertising. We may use both first and third party cookies. First party cookies belong to us and third party cookies are ones that another party places on your device. Third party cookies may be used by companies providing a service to us or by business partners in order to advertise to you. By using your device or web browser’s settings, or both, you may modify your cookie settings. Please note, when you disable cookies you may not be able to access certain parts of the Service or the Service may not work properly.
To learn more about how advertisers generally use cookies and the choices advertisers provide, visit:
The Network Advertising Initiative at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
The Digital Advertising Alliance at
http://www.aboutads.info/
The Internet Advertising Bureau (US) at
http://www.iab.net/
We also allow advertisers and/or merchant partners (“Advertisers”) to choose the demographic information of users who will see their advertisements and/or promotional offers and you agree that we may provide any of the information we have collected from you in non-personally identifiable form to an Advertiser, in order for that Advertiser to select the appropriate audience for those advertisements and/or offers. We, and these Advertisers, may use both first and third party cookies to inform, optimize and serve advertisements based on your use of the Service and any demographic information collected through your use of the Services. For example, we might use the fact you are located in a specific city to show you advertisements targeted to that city.
To do so these advertisers may place or recognize a unique “web beacon” on your browser or device (including through the use of pixel tags). These web beacons allow ad networks to provide anonymized, aggregated auditing, research and reporting for us and for advertisers. The web beacons also enable ad networks to serve targeted advertisements to you when you visit other sites, or re-target you on our site. Because your web browser or device must request these advertisements and web beacons from the ad network’s servers, these companies can view, edit, or set their own web beacons, just as if you had requested a web page from their site. You may be able to opt-out of web beacon tracking by adjusting the settings on your browser or device. For instance many devices have a “Do Not Track” setting that you can be turned on.
Some of these advertisers, advertising technology companies, and service providers that perform advertising-related services for us and our business partners may be members of the Network Advertising Initiative ("NAI"), a cooperative of online marketing companies that offers a centralized tool for opting out of behavioral advertising delivered by each of its member companies. See http://www.networkadvertising.org for general information about the NAI and http://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp for the opt-out page. You may also visit http://www.aboutads.info/consumers/ to learn about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out from ads served by some or all participating companies.
These opt-out mechanisms rely on cookies to remember your choices. If you delete your cookies or web beacons, use another computer or device, or change browsers, you will need to repeat this process. In addition, opting out of interest-based ads will not opt you out of all ads, but rather only those ads that are personalized to your interests.
How Does Haystack Use the Personal Information We Collect?
Personal Information about our Users is an integral part of our business. Haystack uses the Personal Information that we collect about you for the following purposes:
To identify you as a User of the Service when you login to your User Profile.
To customize and personalize the Content provided to you.
To process payment for a Haystack TV Premium subscription.
Your email address may be used to send you service updates and notifications regarding your account, newsletters, marketing communications, and certain email notifications. For information on how to change your preferences, and to unsubscribe from various Haystack communications, please see the Access, Choice and Control section below.
Your Personal Information is also used for the following general purposes:
To operate and maintain your Haystack account, and to provide you with access to the Service that you may request from time to time;
To provide you with technical support;
To respond to you about any comment or inquiry you have submitted;
To customize your use of the Service and/or content of any email or other material we may send you from time to time;
To conduct research and analysis, and to improve our marketing efforts. For example, through targeted advertising and marketing on third party platforms;
To prevent or take action against activities that are, or may be, in breach of our Terms of Use or applicable law; and
For other purposes, provided that we disclose this to you at a relevant time.
How Does Haystack Share Your Personal Information?
Unless listed in this Privacy Policy, Haystack only uses Personal Information in aggregate form, that is, as a statistical measure, and not in a manner that would identify you personally. This type of aggregate data enables us to figure out how often Users use parts of the Service so that we can make the Service appealing to as many Users as possible, and improve those services. As part of this use of information, we may provide aggregate information to our partners, our advertisers, and other third parties about how our Users collectively use our Service. We share this type of statistical data so that the aforementioned parties may also understand how often people use their services and our Service, so that they, too, may provide you with an optimal experience.
Haystack never discloses aggregate information in a manner that would reveal your email address or contact information, or in a manner that would identify you individually, either online or in real life.
There are circumstances where we need to share some of the Personal Information we collect about you or which you provide to us:
We will disclose your Personal Information if you have explicitly agreed that we may do so. We will make this clear to you at the point at which we collect your Personal Information or at another time prior to disclosure of the information.
We will disclose your Personal Information if we believe in good faith that we are permitted or required to do so by law, including in response to a court order, subpoena or other legal demand or request.
We may disclose your Personal Information if we feel it is necessary in order to protect or defend our legitimate rights, property, and interests, or those of our Users, employees, directors, shareholders, or any other third party, and/or to ensure the safety and security of the Service and/or the Users community.
We may transfer your Personal Information to any person or company that acquires all or substantially all of Haystack, or on a merger of our business or in the case of our insolvency. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur, and that any transferee may continue to use your Personal Information as set forth in this Privacy Policy.
We may disclose your Personal Information to fulfill the purpose for which you provide it. For example, if you give us an email address to use the "email a friend" feature of our Service, we will transmit the contents of that email and your email address to the recipients.
We may disclose your Personal Information to contractors, service providers, and other third parties we use to support our business and who are bound by contractual obligations to keep personal information confidential and use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
We collect and use data for interest-based advertising and tailored advertising purposes. Interest-based advertising, also known as personalized or targeted advertising, involves collecting data across different websites and applications to predict your preferences and show you advertisements that are more likely to be of interest to you. Tailored advertising involves customizing advertisements based on data we collect about your activities, preferences, and interactions.
The data collected for these purposes may include, but is not limited to:
Information about your interactions with our websites, applications, and advertisements.
Data from cookies and similar tracking technologies placed on your device.
Information provided by third parties, such as demographic data, interests, and preferences.
This data collection and use comply with the guidelines set forth by the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and applicable data protection laws, including the
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
and the
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
.
You have the right to manage your preferences and opt-out of interest-based and tailored advertising at any time. 
                                For more information on how to do this, please refer to the
Retention, Access, Choice and Control
section of this Privacy Policy.
Security
We have implemented measures designed to secure your personal information from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. All information you provide to us is stored on our secure servers behind firewalls. Any payment transactions and confidential information will be encrypted using SSL technology with DDoS protection.
Haystack endeavors to protect User account information to ensure that account information is kept private, however, Haystack cannot guarantee the security of User account information. Unauthorized entry or use, hardware or software failure, and other factors, may compromise the security of user information at any time.
The safety and security of your information also depends on you. Where we have given you (or where you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Service, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share your password with anyone.
The Service may contain links to other sites. Haystack is not responsible for the privacy policies and/or practices on other sites. When linking to another site you should read the privacy policy state on that site. This Privacy Policy only governs information collected on the Service.
Retention, Access, Choice and Control
We maintain data related to your usage of the Service for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Policy, as may be required (or permitted) by law such as for tax and accounting purposes, or as otherwise communicated to you. Once you have asked us to close your account and delete your profile information, we will delete all information that we are not required or permitted to retain by law.
You can always opt not to disclose information, even though it may be needed to take advantage of certain features of the Service. You are able to add or update certain information in your account settings, as well as on User Profile. When you update your information, however, we often maintain a copy of the unrevised information in our records. You can unsubscribe from email newsletters and notifications (other than essential email notifications) at any time by clicking on the link at the end of each email.
As a Haystack User, you have the right to review and obtain a downloadable copy of your Personal Information from Haystack, to request corrections to your Personal Information, and to request deletion of your Personal Information from Haystack. We may not accommodate a request to change information if we believe the change would violate any law or legal requirement or cause the information to be incorrect. You may also withdraw your consent to receive e-mail communications from us at any time. You may withdraw your consent to our collection, use, and sharing of your Personal Information at any time by sending an e-mail request to
contact@haystack.tv
.
You can control the use of cookies and tracking technologies and manage your preferences for interest-based advertising and tailored advertising. To learn more about how you can manage these preferences or opt-out, please visit the NAI Consumer Opt-Out Page or adjust your browser settings.
From time to time, we may desire to use Personal Information for uses not previously disclosed in our Privacy Policy. If our practices change regarding previously collected Personal Information, we will provide notice and obtain consent to any such uses as may be required by law.
Deleting Your Account
You may terminate this Agreement at any time by deleting your User Profile (if applicable), and thereafter ceasing to use the Service. Simply deleting the Service from your mobile device will not effectively terminate this Agreement. If you ask us to delete your User Profile, we will do so within a reasonable period of time.
Once your account has been terminated, any and all information within your account will be irretrievably deleted by Haystack, except to the extent that we are obliged or permitted to retain such data or information for a certain period of time in accordance with applicable laws and regulations and/or to protect our legitimate business interests. You are advised to save or back up any material that you have uploaded to your account before terminating your account, as Haystack assumes no liability for any material that is irretrievably deleted following any termination of your account.
Notice to Users Outside the U.S.
Our Service is controlled and operated within the United States. If you access our Service outside of the United States, we may transfer the information collected from you to data centers outside of your home country or jurisdiction. In particular, your information may be transferred to and processed in the United States and other jurisdictions where we, our service providers, or our vendors operate, where data protection and other laws may not be equivalent to those in your jurisdiction. By using the Service, you agree that your information can be transferred to and used in the United States and in other jurisdictions where we, our service providers, or our vendors operate, as set forth in the Privacy Policy.
NOTICE TO EU RESIDENTS: In addition to this Privacy Policy, our handling of information about EU residents is further governed by the Notice to EU Residents (below).
Changes and Updates to this Privacy Policy
Haystack reserves the right to change, alter, replace or otherwise modify this Privacy Policy at any time by posting the amended Privacy Policy on or within the Service. You may also be given additional notice, such as an e-mail message or messaging within the Service, of any changes. You will be deemed to have accepted such changes by continuing to use the Service. Except as otherwise stated, all amended terms shall automatically be effective 30 days after they are initially posted
Merger or Sale
In the event that Haystack TV, or some or all assets related to the Services are acquired by or merged with a third-party entity or in connection with a contemplated change of ownership transaction, we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign the information that we have collected from users as part of that merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control event, including in the course of diligence.
Questions or Concerns
If you have any questions or concerns regarding privacy at Haystack, please send us a detailed message to
contact@haystack.tv
. We will make every effort to resolve your concerns.
If you decide that you do not want us to use your Personal Information in the manner described in the Privacy Policy, please do not use the Service. If you have already registered an account, you can find out how to terminate or cancel your account in the
Deleting Your Account
section above.
Your State Privacy Rights
If you are a resident of California, Nevada, Virginia, Colorado, Utah, Texas, Oregon and Connecticut, the processing of certain personal data about you may be subject to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) and other applicable state privacy laws from California, Nevada, Virginia, Colorado, Utah, and Connecticut.
For the purposes of this section, “personal information” means “personal data”, “personal information” or similar terms under the applicable privacy laws of the state in which you reside. Please note that not all of the rights listed below are applicable to all users, and if you are not a resident of the applicable states, you may not be able to exercise these rights.
In particular, you may have the following rights, however, these rights are not absolute and in certain cases, we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Know: The right to request that we disclose the Personal Information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices. As a California resident, you may request information about the categories of personal information that we have collected; the categories of sources from which we collected personal information; the business or commercial purpose for collecting, sharing and/or selling personal information; the categories of any personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose; and the categories of any third parties with whom personal information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose;
Access: The right to request copies of your personal information that we have collected about you;
Correction: The right to request that we correct any inaccurate personal information that we have collected about you;
Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete Personal Information that we have collected from you;
Opt Out: The right to opt out of (i) tracking activities for targeted advertising purposes, (ii) sales of your personal information, and (iii) certain “profiling” as defined in applicable privacy laws, which may include automated processing to analyze or predict your interests or other behavior;
Non-Discrimination: You have the right to not be discriminated against for exercising any of these rights. For example, if you exercise your rights, we will not deny you services, charge you different prices for services or provide you a different level or quality of services.
Sensitive Data: We do not use your data for the purpose of profiling to make any decisions that would have legal or similarly significant effects on you. We do not knowingly process “sensitive data” as defined in state laws.
Colorado, Connecticut, Virginia, and Utah each provide their state residents with rights to:
Confirm whether we process their personal information.
Access and delete certain personal information.
Data portability.
Opt-out of personal data processing for targeted advertising and sales.
Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia also provide their state residents with rights to:
Correct inaccuracies in their personal information, taking into account the information's nature processing purpose.
Opt-out of profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects.
To exercise any of these rights, please submit a request to us in writing at
contact@haystack.tv
.
This Privacy Policy includes what Personal Information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months (depending on how you use our Service), the source of the Personal Information, and the purposes of use, as well as whether we disclose that Personal Information and if so, the categories of third parties to whom it is disclosed.
In particular, we have collected the following categories of Personal Information from consumers within the last 12 months:
Category
Information We Actually Collect
Collected
Identifiers.
We collect names, alias, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
YES
Personal Information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
Some Personal Information included in this category may overlap with other categories. If you are member, we may collect all or part of your name. If you are a premium member, we may collect your billing address and partial (but not full) debit card numbers and/or credit card numbers.
YES
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law.
None
NO
Commercial information.
We collect records of purchases of premium subscriptions.
YES
Biometric Information
We collect behavioral information, such as keystrokes, links, screens, and videos accessed by you from our service, which device you are using to access our service.
YES
Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement.
YES
Geolocation data.
We collect the physical location of users in order to serve locally relevant content and ads.
YES
Professional or employment-related information.
None
NO
Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99)).
None
NO
Inferences drawn from other Personal Information.
Profile reflecting a person’s news preferences
YES
We obtain the categories of Personal Information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you. For example, from forms you complete or products and services you purchase.
Indirectly from you. For example, from observing your actions on our Service.
Via third party integrations such as social sign in services
If you are a California resident, California law may provide you with additional rights regarding our use of your Personal Information. To learn more about your California privacy rights, visit
https://oag.ca.gov/privacy/ccpa
.
Exercising Your State Privacy Rights
California residents can exercise the above rights themselves, or designate and authorized agent to make requests on their behalf. To either exercise your rights or to have an authorized agent (as applicable) request to do so, please email us at
contact@haystack.tv
and provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected Personal Information or an authorized representative, which may include: your name, user id, email, or billing address.
We may request additional documentation or information solely for the purpose of verifying your identity before completing your request. An authorized agent must have your signed permission to submit a request on your behalf or provide proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California law. Before completing a request from an authorized agent, we may contact you directly to confirm your identity and/or to confirm that you’ve given the agent permission to act on your behalf.
If you want to make a request, but do not have an account with us, we will ask you for information which we consider necessary to verify your identity for security and to prevent fraud. This information may include name, contact information, and information related to your transaction or relationship with us, but the specific information requested may differ depending on the circumstances of your request for your security and to protect privacy rights. If we delete your Personal Information, we will both cause certain Personal Information about you to be permanently unrecoverable and also deidentify certain Personal Information.
Notice to EU Residents
In addition to the practices and rights discussed in this Privacy Policy, residents of the EU have certain additional rights and guidelines.
What are your data protection rights?
We would like to make sure you are fully aware of all of your data protection rights. If you are a resident of the EU, you are entitled to the following:
The right to be informed
– You have the right to know what Personal Information we are processing, why, and who else the data may be passed to.
The right to access
– You have the right to request for copies of your Personal Information. We may charge you a small fee for this service.
The right to rectification
– You have the right to request that we correct any information you believe is inaccurate. You also have the right to request us to complete the information you believe is incomplete.
The right to erasure
– You have the right to request that we erase your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
The right to restrict processing
– You have the right to request that we restrict the processing of your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
The right to object to processing
– You have the right to object to our company’s processing of your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
The right to data portability
– You have the right to request that our company transfer the data that we have collected to another organization, or directly to you, under certain conditions.
Lawful Basis for the Processing of Personal Information
Haystack is required to demonstrate a lawful basis for the processing of Personal Information. Haystack relies on legitimate interest to process data for the following purposes:
Data analytics
Managing user accounts
Operating, modifying and improving the Service
Identifying usage trends
Customizing content and user experience
Web hosting
Direct marketing
Fraud prevention
Network and information systems security
To determine the effectiveness of ads
To serve ads based on user behavior and preferences
Responding to user questions and requests for information
Comply with laws and regulations and enforce Haystack’s Terms of Use and other legal rights
Transfer of Data Abroad
Because we operate the Service from the US, your Personal Information may be transferred to the US and/or to countries or territories outside the EEA or Switzerland not recognized by the European Commission as ensuring an adequate level of protection pursuant to the GDPR. Where required, data transfers will be made subject to the terms of the applicable EU Standard Contractual Clauses or with your consent. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that Personal Information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy in respect of such transfer.
Security
Haystack employs physical, technical and organizational safeguards to ensure an appropriate level of security for Personal Information, taking into account the costs of implementation and the nature, scope, context and purposes of processing as well as the risk of varying likelihood and security for the rights and freedoms of natural persons.
Further Processing
If Haystack plans to use Personal Information for a new purpose, it will update this notice and communicate the changes to individuals before starting any new processing.
If you have concerns about the way we handle your Personal Information, please let us know immediately. If you would like to make a request and/or exercise any of the above rights, please contact us at our email:
contact@haystack.tv
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://oag.ca.gov/privacy/ccpa:
Skip to main content
Home
About
Who We Are
About AG Rob Bonta
About the Office of the Attorney General
History of the Office
What We Do
Public Safety
Opinions and Quo Warranto
Research Advisory Panel
Research Center
Children & Families
Civil Rights
Consumer Protection
Environment & Public Health
What We're Working On
Housing
Office of Gun Violence Prevention
21st Century Policing
Consumer Protection and Economic Opportunity
Health Care
Environmental Justice
Equality
Immigration
Children’s Rights
OpenJustice
Media
Media Center
Press Releases
Media Library
Social Media
Facebook
Twitter
Instagram
YouTube
Careers
Career Opportunities
How to Apply
Assessments
Job Vacancies
Internships & Student Positions
Become a Special Agent
Become a Deputy Attorney General
Organization of the Office
About the Office
Legal Services Divisions
Division of Law Enforcement
California Justice Information Services (CJIS)
Administration
AG Honors Program & Geoffrey Wright Solicitor General Fellowship
Attorney General's Honors Program
Geoffrey Wright Solicitor General Fellowship
Regulations
Resources
For Businesses
Submit Data Security Breach
Privacy Resources
SB 478 - Hidden Fees
Service on the Attorney General
Office Locations / Status Updates
Laws Requiring Service on the AG
Open Government
Overview
Ballot Initiatives
Conflicts of Interest
Criminal Justice Statistics
Public Records
Publications
Grants
Grant Opportunities
Programs
Programs
See All Programs
Most Popular
Charities
Megan's Law
CURES
Service on the Attorney General
Division of Medi-Cal Fraud & Elder Abuse
Most Popular
Permits & Registrations
Prop 65 – Safe Drinking Water
Missing Persons
Data Security Breach
Human Trafficking
Appointments
Contact
Contact Us
Contact Us - En español
Contáctenos/Formularios
Service on the Attorney General
Home
Privacy
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
Updated on March 13, 2024
The
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
(CCPA) gives consumers more control over the personal information that businesses collect about them and the
CCPA regulations
provide guidance on how to implement the law.  This landmark law secures new privacy rights for California consumers, including:
The
right to know
about the personal information a business collects about them and how it is used and shared;
The
right to delete
personal information collected from them (with some exceptions);
The
right to opt-out
of the sale or sharing of their personal information including via the
GPC
;
The
right to non-discrimination
for exercising their CCPA rights.
In November of 2020, California voters approved
Proposition 24, the CPRA
, which amended the CCPA and added new additional privacy protections that began on January 1, 2023. As of January 1, 2023, consumers have new rights in addition to those above, such as:
The
right to correct
inaccurate personal information that a business has about them; and
The
right to limit
the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information collected about them.
Businesses
that are subject to the CCPA have several responsibilities, including responding to consumer requests to exercise these rights and giving consumers certain
notices explaining their privacy practices
. The CCPA applies to many businesses, including
data brokers
.
CPRA amends the CCPA; it does not create a separate, new law.  As a result, our office typically refers to the law as “CCPA” or “CCPA, as amended.”
Links to Topics
A. GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE CCPA
B. RIGHT TO OPT-OUT OF SALE OR SHARING
C. REQUESTS TO KNOW
D. REQUESTS TO DELETE
E. REQUESTS TO CORRECT
F. REQUESTS TO LIMIT USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
G. RIGHT TO NON-DISCRIMINATION
H. REQUIRED NOTICES
I. DATA BROKERS AND THE CCPA
Other Consumer Resources on CCPA
Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs)
These FAQs provide general consumer information about the CCPA and how you can exercise your rights under the CCPA. They are not legal advice, regulatory guidance, or an opinion of the Attorney General. We will update this information periodically.
A. GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE CCPA
1. What rights do I have under the CCPA?
If you are a California resident, you may ask businesses to disclose what personal information they have about you and what they do with that information, to delete your personal information, to direct businesses not to sell or share your personal information, to correct inaccurate information that they have about you, and to limit businesses’ use and disclosure of your sensitive personal information:
Right to know
: You can request that a business disclose to you: (1) the categories and/or specific pieces of personal information they have collected about you, (2) the categories of sources for that personal information, (3) the purposes for which the business uses that information, (4) the categories of third parties with whom the business discloses the information, and (5) the categories of information that the business sells or discloses to third parties. You can make a request to know up to twice a year, free of charge.
Right to delete
: You can request that businesses delete personal information they collected from you and tell their service providers to do the same, subject to certain exceptions (such as if the business is legally required to keep the information).
Right to opt-out of sale or sharing
: You may request that businesses stop selling or sharing your personal information (“opt-out”), including via a user-enabled global privacy control. Businesses cannot sell or share your personal information after they receive your opt-out request unless you later authorize them to do so again.
Right to correct
: You may ask businesses to correct inaccurate information that they have about you.
Right to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information
: You can direct businesses to only use your sensitive personal information (for example, your social security number, financial account information, your precise geolocation data, or your genetic data) for limited purposes, such as providing you with the services you requested.
You also have the right to be notified, before or at the point businesses collect your personal information, of the types of personal information they are collecting and what they may do with that information. Generally, businesses cannot discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the CCPA. Businesses cannot make you waive these rights, and any contract provision that says you waive these rights is unenforceable.
2. What if I am not a California resident?
Only California residents have rights under the CCPA. A California resident is a natural person (as opposed to a corporation or other business entity) who resides in California, even if the person is temporarily outside of the state.
3. What is considered personal information and sensitive personal information under the CCPA?
Personal information
is information that identifies, relates to, or could reasonably be linked with you or your household. For example, it could include your name, social security number, email address, records of products purchased, internet browsing history, geolocation data, fingerprints, and inferences from other personal information that could create a profile about your preferences and characteristics.
Sensitive personal information
is a specific subset of personal information that includes certain government identifiers (such as social security numbers); an account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number with any required security code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account; precise geolocation; contents of mail, email, and text messages; genetic data; biometric information processed to identify a consumer; information concerning a consumer’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; or information about racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership. Consumers have the right to also limit a business’s use and disclosure of their sensitive personal information.
Personal information does not include publicly available information (including public real estate/property records) and certain
types of information
.
4. What is not considered personal information under the CCPA?
Personal information does not include publicly available information that is from federal, state, or local government records, such as professional licenses and public real estate/property records.  The definition of publicly available information also includes information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public by the consumer or from widely distributed media, or certain information disclosed by a consumer and made available if the consumer has not restricted the information to a specific audience.
The CCPA also exempts certain types of information such as certain medical information and consumer credit reporting information.
5. What businesses does the CCPA apply to?
The CCPA applies to for-profit businesses that do business in California and meet any of the following:
Have a gross annual revenue of over $25 million;
Buy, sell, or share the personal information of 100,000 or more California residents or households; or
Derive 50% or more of their annual revenue from selling California residents’ personal information.
6. Does the CCPA apply to nonprofits or government agencies?
The CCPA generally does not apply to nonprofit organizations or government agencies.
7. What can I do if I think a business violated the CCPA?
You cannot sue businesses for most CCPA violations. You can only sue a business under the CCPA if there is a data breach, and even then, only under limited circumstances. You can sue a business if your nonencrypted and nonredacted personal information was stolen in a data breach as a result of the business’s failure to maintain reasonable security procedures and practices to protect it. If this happens, you can sue for the amount of monetary damages you actually suffered from the breach or “statutory damages” of up to $750 per incident. Before suing, you must give the business written notice of which CCPA sections it violated and allow 30 days to respond in writing that it has cured the violations and that no further violations will occur. If the business is able to actually cure the violation and gives you its written statement that it has done so, you cannot sue the business, unless it continues to violate the CCPA contrary to its statement.
For all other violations of the CCPA, only the Attorney General or the California Privacy Protection Agency may take legal action against non-compliant entities. The Attorney General does not represent individual California consumers. Using consumer complaints and other information, the Attorney General may identify patterns of misconduct that may lead to investigations and actions on behalf of the collective legal interests of the people of California. If you believe a business has violated the CCPA, you may
file a consumer complaint
with the Office of the Attorney General. If you choose to file a complaint with our office, explain exactly how the business violated the CCPA, and describe when and how the violation occurred. Please note that the Attorney General cannot represent you or give you legal advice on how to resolve your individual complaint.  Starting on July 1, 2023, you also will be able to file complaints with the
California Privacy Protection Agency
for violations of the CCPA, as amended, occurring on or after that date.
8. What kind of data breach can I sue a business for under the CCPA?
You can only sue businesses under the CCPA if certain conditions are met. The type of personal information that must have been stolen is your first name (or first initial) and last name in combination with any of the following:
Your social security number
Your driver’s license number, tax identification number, passport number, military identification number, or other unique identification number issued on a government document commonly used to identify a person's identity
Your financial account number, credit card number, or debit card number if combined with any required security code, access code, or password that would allow someone access to your account
Your medical or health insurance information
Your fingerprint, retina or iris image, or other unique biometric data used to identify a person's identity (but not including photographs unless used or stored for facial recognition purposes)
This personal information must have been stolen in nonencrypted and nonredacted form. In addition, the personal information must have been stolen in a data breach as a result of the business’s failure to maintain reasonable security procedures and practices to protect it. If this happens, you can sue for the amount of monetary damages you actually suffered from the breach or “statutory damages” of up to $750 per incident. Before suing, you must give the business written notice of which CCPA sections it violated and allow 30 days to respond in writing that it has cured the violations and that no further violations will occur. If the business is able to actually cure the violation and gives you its written statement that it has done so, you cannot sue the business, unless it continues to violate the CCPA contrary to its statement.
9. Do businesses need to comply with the statutory CPRA amendments to the CCPA that went into effect on January 1, 2023?
Yes. As of January 1, 2023, the CPRA’s amendments to the CCPA are in effect, and businesses are required to comply with all express statutory requirements. Businesses are also required to comply with those CCPA regulations currently in effect.
10. Are there any CCPA regulations currently in effect?
Yes. The California Department of Justice promulgated an initial round of regulations implementing the CCPA on August 14, 2020 and further amended on March 15, 2021. Those regulations were recently updated by the California Privacy Protection Agency. These regulations appear in
Title 11, Division 6, Section 7001 et seq. of the California Code of Regulations
and were effective on March 29, 2023.
11. Are the statutory exemptions for employee data and business-to-business transactions still in effect?
No. The exemptions for employment-related personal information and personal information reflecting business-to-business transactions described in Civil Code Sec. 1798.145(m)-(n) expired on December 31, 2022.
12. Can I use an authorized agent to submit a request?
Yes.  You may authorize another person to submit a CCPA request on your behalf.  You may also authorize a business entity registered with the California Secretary of State to submit a request on your behalf.
Please note that if you use an authorized agent, businesses may require more information from either the authorized agent or from you to verify that you are the person directing the agent.  For example, for requests to know or delete your personal information, the business may require the authorized agent to provide proof that you gave that agent signed permission to submit the request.  Businesses may also require you to verify your identity directly with the business or directly confirm with the business that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Back To Top
B. RIGHT TO OPT-OUT OF SALE OR SHARING
1. What is the right to opt-out?
You may request that businesses stop selling or sharing your personal information (“opt-out”).  Note that sharing refers specifically to sharing for cross-context behavioral advertising, which is the targeting of advertising to a
consumer
based on the
consumer
’s
personal information
obtained from the
consumer
’s online activity across numerous websites. With some exceptions, businesses cannot sell or share your personal information after they receive your opt-out request unless you later provide authorization allowing them to do so again. Businesses must wait at least 12 months before asking you to opt back in to the sale or sharing of your personal information.
2. Can businesses sell a child’s personal information?
Businesses can only sell the personal information of a child that they know to be under the age of 16 if they get affirmative authorization (“opt-in”) for the sale of the child’s personal information. For children under the age of 13, that opt-in must come from the child’s parent or guardian. For children who are at least 13 years old but under the age of 16, the opt-in can come from the child.
3. How do I submit my opt-out request?
Businesses that sell personal information are subject to the CCPA's requirement to provide a clear and conspicuous “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link on their website that allows you to submit an opt-out request. Businesses cannot require you to create an account in order to submit your request. Businesses also should not require you to verify your identity, though they can ask you basic questions to identify which personal information is associated with you.
You can also submit an opt-out request via a user-enabled global privacy control, like the GPC, discussed in FAQ 8 & 9 below. If you can’t find a business’s “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link, review its privacy policy to see if it sells or shares personal information. If the business does, it must also include that link in its privacy policy.
If a business’s "Do Not Sell My Personal Information" link or other designated method of submitting opt-out requests is not working or difficult to find, you may report the business to our office (
https://oag.ca.gov/contact/consumer-complaint-against-business-or-company
).
4. How long does the business have to respond to my opt-out request?
Businesses must respond as soon as feasibly possible to your request, up to a maximum of 15 business days from the date they received your request to opt-out.
5. Why is the business asking me for more information?
While businesses are not required to verify that the person submitting an opt-out request is really the consumer for whom the business has personal information, they may need to ask you for additional information to make sure they stop selling the right person’s personal information. If the business asks for personal information to verify your identity, it can only use that information for this verification purpose.
6. Why did the business deny my opt-out request?
There are some exceptions to the opt-out right. Common reasons why businesses may refuse to stop selling your personal information include:
Sale or sharing is necessary for the business to comply with legal obligations, exercise legal claims or rights, or defend legal claims
The information is publicly available information, certain medical information, consumer credit reporting information, or other types of information exempt from the CCPA.
See
Civil Code section 1798.145
for more exceptions.
If you do not know why a business denied your opt-out request, follow up with the business to ask it for its reasons.
7. Why did I get a response that the business is a service provider that does not have to act on my request?
Many businesses use other businesses to provide services for them. For example, a retailer may contract with a payment card processor to process customer credit card transactions or a shipping company to deliver orders. These entities may qualify as “service providers” under the CCPA.
The CCPA treats service providers differently than the businesses they serve. It is the business that is responsible for responding to consumer requests.  If you submit a request to opt-out to a service provider of a business instead of the business itself, the service provider may deny the request. You must submit your request to the business itself.
If a service provider has said that it does not or cannot act on your request because it is a service provider, you may follow up to ask who the business is. However, sometimes the service provider will not be able to provide that information. You may be able to determine who the business is based on the services that the service provider provides, although sometimes this may be difficult or impossible.
8. What is the GPC?
Businesses that sell or share personal information must offer two or more methods for consumers to submit requests to opt-out of the sale of their personal information. For businesses that collect personal information from consumers online, one acceptable method for consumers to opt-out of sales or sharing is via a user-enabled global privacy control, like the
GPC
.  Developed in response to the CCPA and to enhance consumer privacy rights, the GPC is a ‘stop selling or sharing my data switch’ that is available on some internet browsers, like Mozilla Firefox, Duck Duck Go, and Brave, or as a browser extension. It is a proposed technical standard that reflects what the CCPA regulations contemplated – some consumers want a comprehensive option that broadly signals their opt-out request, as opposed to making requests on multiple websites on different browsers or devices. Opting out of the sale or sharing of personal information should be easy for consumers, and the GPC is one option for consumers who want to submit requests to opt-out of the sale or sharing of personal information via a user-enabled global privacy control. Under law, it must be honored by covered businesses as a valid consumer request to stop the sale or sharing of personal information.
To learn more about the GPC, you can also visit
https://oag.ca.gov/privacy/ccpa/gpc
9. How do I submit my opt-out request using the GPC?
To learn more about the GPC, you can visit its website
here
.  Developers have begun to innovate around the GPC and created different mechanisms for consumers, such as EFF’s
Privacy Badger
extension or the Brave Privacy Browser.
Back To Top
C. REQUESTS TO KNOW
1. What is the right to know?
You may request that businesses disclose to you what personal information they have collected, used, shared, or sold about you, and why they collected, used, shared, or sold that information. Specifically, you may request that businesses disclose:
The categories of personal information collected
Specific pieces of personal information collected
The categories of sources from which the business collected personal information
The purposes for which the business uses the personal information
The categories of third parties with whom the business shares the personal information
The categories of information that the business sells or discloses to third parties
Businesses must provide you this information for the 12-month period preceding your request. They must provide this information to you free of charge.
2. How do I submit my request to know?
Businesses must designate at least two methods for you to submit your request—for example, an email address, website form, or hard copy form. One of those methods has to be a toll-free phone number and, if the business has a website, one of those methods has to be through its website. However, if a business operates exclusively online, it only needs to provide an email address for submitting requests to know.
Businesses cannot make you create an account just to submit a request to know, but if you already have an account with the business, it may require you to submit your request through that account.
Make sure you submit your request to know through one of the business’s designated methods, which may be different from its normal customer service contact information. If you can’t find a business’s designated methods, review its privacy policy, which must include instructions on how you can submit your request.
If a business’s designated method of submitting requests to know is not working, notify the business in writing and consider submitting your request through another designated method if possible.
3. How long does the business have to respond to my request to know?
Businesses must respond to your request within 45 calendar days. They can extend that deadline by another 45 days (90 days total) if they notify you.
If you submitted a request to know and have not received any response within the timeline, check the business’s privacy policy to make sure you submitted your request through the designated way. Follow up with the business to see if the business is subject to the CCPA and to follow up on your request.
4. Why is the business asking me for more information?
Businesses must verify that the person making a request to know is the consumer about whom the business has personal information. Businesses may need to ask you for additional information for verification purposes. If the business asks for personal information to verify your identity, it can only use that information for this verification purpose.
5. Why did the business deny my request to know?
There are some exceptions to the right to know. Common reasons why businesses may refuse to disclose your personal information include:
The business cannot verify your request
The request is manifestly unfounded or excessive, or the business has already provided personal information to you more than twice in a 12-month period
Businesses cannot disclose certain sensitive information, such as your social security number, financial account number, or account passwords, but they must tell you if they’re collecting that type of information
Disclosure would restrict the business’s ability to comply with legal obligations, exercise legal claims or rights, or defend legal claims
If the personal information is certain medical information, consumer credit reporting information, or other types of information exempt from the CCPA
See
Civil Code section 1798.145
for more exceptions.
If you do not know why a business denied your request to know, follow up with the business to ask it for its reasons.
6. Why did I get a response that the business is a service provider that does not have to act on my request?
Many businesses use other businesses to provide services for them. For example, a retailer may contract with a payment card processor to process customer credit card transactions or a shipping company to deliver orders. These entities may qualify as “service providers” under the CCPA.
The CCPA treats service providers differently than the businesses they serve. It is the business that is responsible for responding to consumer requests.  If you submit a request to know to a service provider of a business instead of the business itself, the service provider may deny the request. You must submit your request to the business itself.
If a service provider has said that it does not or cannot act on your request because it is a service provider, you may follow up to ask who the business is. However, sometimes the service provider will not be able to provide that information. You may be able to determine who the business is based on the services that the service provider provides, although sometimes this may be difficult or impossible.
Back To Top
D. REQUESTS TO DELETE
1. What is my right to delete personal information?
You may request that businesses delete personal information they collected from you and to tell their service providers to do the same. However, there are
many exceptions
(see FAQ D.5) that allow businesses to keep your personal information.
2. How do I submit my right to delete?
Review the business’s privacy policy, which must include instructions on how you can submit your request to delete.
Businesses must designate at least two methods for you to submit your request—for example, a toll-free number, email address, website form, or hard copy form. However, if a business operates exclusively online, it only needs to provide an email address for submitting requests.
Businesses cannot make you create an account just to submit a deletion request, but if you already have an account with the business, it may require you to submit your request through that account.
Make sure you submit your deletion request through one of the business’s designated methods, which may be different from its normal customer service contact information.
If a business’s designated method of submitting requests to delete is not working, notify the business in writing and consider submitting your request through another designated method if possible.
3. How long does the business have to respond to my request to delete?
Businesses must respond to your request within 45 calendar days. They can extend that deadline by another 45 days (90 days total) if they notify you.
If you submitted a request to delete and have not received any response within the timeline, check the business’s privacy policy to make sure you submitted your request through the designated way. Follow up with the business to see if the business is subject to the CCPA and to follow up on your request.
4. Why is the business asking me for more information?
Businesses must verify that the person making a request to delete is the consumer about whom the business has personal information. Businesses may need to ask you for additional information for verification purposes. If the business asks for personal information to verify your identity, it can only use that information for this verification purpose.
5. Why did the business deny my request to delete?
There are exceptions to the right to delete. Common reasons why businesses may keep your personal information include:
If the information is exempt from the CCPA.  This includes:
Publicly available information (such as your address, which is often in public real estate/property records)
.  However, if you are a law enforcement officer, public official, or Safe at Home participant (available to victims of domestic violence, stalking, sexual assault, human trafficking, elder and dependent abuse, as well as reproductive health workers), you may request a website to not publicly post your address as described
here
.
Certain
types of information
such as medical information or consumer credit reporting information.
The business cannot verify your request
To complete your transaction, provide a reasonably anticipated product or service, or for certain warranty and product recall purposes
For certain business security practices
For certain internal uses that are compatible with reasonable consumer expectations or the context in which the information was provided
To comply with legal obligations, exercise legal claims or rights, or defend legal claims
If the personal information is certain medical information, consumer credit reporting information, or other types of information exempt from the CCPA
See
Civil Code sections 1798.105(d)
and
1798.145
for more exceptions.
If you do not know why a business denied your request to delete, follow up with the business to ask it for its reasons.
6. Why did I get a response that the business is a service provider that does not have to act on my request?
Many businesses use other businesses to provide services for them. For example, a retailer may contract with a payment card processor to process customer credit card transactions or a shipping company to deliver orders. These entities may qualify as “service providers” under the CCPA.
The CCPA treats service providers differently than the businesses they serve. It is the business that is responsible for responding to consumer requests.  If you submit a request to delete to a service provider of a business instead of the business itself, the service provider may deny the request. You must submit your request to the business itself.
If a service provider has said that it does not or cannot act on your request because it is a service provider, you may follow up to ask who the business is. However, sometimes the service provider will not be able to provide that information. You may be able to determine who the business is based on the services that the service provider provides, although sometimes this may be difficult or impossible.
7. Why is a debt collector still calling me about my debt even though I asked it to delete my information?
Creditors, collection agencies, and other debt collectors can still try to collect debts that you owe even if you asked them to delete your personal information. Learn more about debt collectors—including what they can and can’t do—
here
.
8. Why is a credit reporting agency still giving out my credit information even though I asked it to delete my information?
Credit reporting agencies like Equifax, Experian, and TransUnion can still collect and disclose your credit information, subject to regulation under the
Fair Credit Reporting Act
. Learn more about your rights under the Fair Credit Reporting Act
here
. Learn more about how to check and fix your credit report
here
.
Back To Top
E. REQUESTS TO CORRECT 
 (RIGHT TO CORRECT)
1. What is the right to correct?
You may ask businesses to correct inaccurate information that they have about you.
The California Privacy Protection Agency is currently engaged in a formal rulemaking process and has
proposed CCPA regulations pertaining to the right to correct
, but these are not currently final or effective.
2.  How do I submit my request to correct?
Review the business’s privacy policy, which should include instructions on how you can submit your request to correct.
Businesses must designate at least two methods for you to submit your request—for example, a toll-free number, email address, website form, or hard copy form. However, if a business operates exclusively online, it only needs to provide an email address for submitting requests.
Businesses cannot make you create an account just to submit a correction request, but if you already have an account with the business, it may require you to submit your request through that account.
Make sure you submit your correction request through one of the business’s designated methods, which may be different from its normal customer service contact information.
If a business’s designated method of submitting requests to correct is not working, notify the business in writing and consider submitting your request through another designated method if possible.
3. How long does the business have to respond to my request to correct?
Businesses must respond to your request within 45 calendar days. They can extend that deadline by another 45 days (90 days total) if they notify you.
If you submitted a request to correct and have not received any response within the timeline, check the business’s privacy policy to make sure you submitted your request through the designated way. Follow up with the business to see if the business is subject to the CCPA and to follow up on your request.
4. Why is the business asking me for more information?
Businesses must verify that the person making a request to correct is the consumer about whom the business has personal information. Businesses may need to ask you for additional information for verification purposes. If the business asks for personal information to verify your identity, it can only use that information for this verification purpose.
5. Why did the business deny my request to correct?
There are exceptions to the right to correct. Common reasons why businesses may deny your request to correct include:
The business cannot verify your identity to complete your request
The request is manifestly unfounded or excessive
The information is publicly available information, certain medical information, consumer credit reporting information, or other types of information exempt from the CCPA
If you do not know why a business denied your request to correct, follow up with the business to ask it for its reasons.
Back To Top
F. REQUESTS TO LIMIT USE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION (RIGHT TO LIMIT)
1. What is the right to limit?
You can direct businesses to only use your sensitive personal information (for example, your social security number, financial account information, your precise geolocation data, or your genetic data) for limited purposes, such as providing you with the services you requested.
The California Privacy Protection Agency is currently engaged in a formal rulemaking process and has
proposed CCPA regulations pertaining to the right to limit
, but these are not currently final or effective.
Back To Top
G. RIGHT TO NON-DISCRIMINATION
Businesses cannot deny goods or services, charge you a different price, or provide a different level or quality of goods or services just because you exercised your rights under the CCPA.
However, if you refuse to provide your personal information to a business or ask it to delete or stop selling your personal information, and that personal information or sale is necessary for the business to provide you with goods or services, the business may not be able to complete that transaction.
Businesses can also offer you promotions, discounts and other deals in exchange for collecting, keeping, or selling your personal information. But they can only do this if the financial incentive offered is reasonably related to the value of your personal information. If you ask a business to delete or stop selling your personal information, you may not be able to continue participating in the special deals they offer in exchange for personal information. If you are not sure how your request may affect your participation in a special offer, ask the business.
Back To Top
H. REQUIRED NOTICES
1. What is a notice at collection?
The CCPA requires businesses to give consumers certain information in a “notice at collection.” A notice at collection must list the categories of personal information businesses collect about consumers and the purposes for which they use the categories of information. (To find out how you can learn what specific information a business has collected about you, see the
Right to Know section
.)  If the business sells consumers’ personal information, then the notice at collection must include a
Do Not Sell or Share link
. The notice must also contain a link to the business’s privacy policy, where consumers can get a fuller description of the business’s privacy practices and of their privacy rights.
2. Where can I find a business’s notice at collection?
This notice must be provided
at or before
the point at which the business collects your personal information. For example, you might find a link to the notice at collection on a website’s homepage and on a webpage where you place an order or enter your personal information for another reason. On a mobile app, you might find a link to the notice in the settings menu. In a retail store, you might find the notice on a printed form used to collect your personal information.
3. What is a privacy policy?
A business’s privacy policy is a written statement that gives a broad picture of its online and offline practices for the collection, use, sharing, and sale of consumers’ personal information. The CCPA requires business privacy policies to include information on consumers’ privacy rights and how to exercise them: the
Right to Know
, the
Right to Delete
, the
Right to Opt-Out of Sale
, the
the Right to Correct
, the
the Right to Limit
, and the
Right to Non-Discrimination
.
4. Where can I find a business’s privacy policy?
Most businesses post their privacy policy on their websites. A link to it can usually be found at the bottom of the homepage and other webpages. The link’s title may include “Privacy” or “California Privacy Rights.” In a mobile app, the privacy policy may be linked on the download page for the app or in the app’s settings menu.
Back To Top
I. DATA BROKERS AND THE CCPA
1. What is a data broker?
Another California law,
Civil Code section 1798.99.80
, defines a data broker as “a business that knowingly collects and sells to third parties the personal information of a consumer with whom the business does not have a direct relationship.” This law exempts certain businesses that are regulated by other laws from this definition. Exempted businesses include consumer reporting agencies (commonly known as credit bureaus) and certain financial institutions and insurance companies.
Data brokers collect information about consumers from many sources including websites, other businesses, and public records. The data broker analyzes and packages the data for sale to other businesses.
2. How can I find data brokers that collect and sell my personal information?
The
California law on data brokers
requires data brokers covered by the law to register with the Attorney General and to provide certain information on their practices. The Data Broker Registry can be found on the Attorney General’s website at
https://oag.ca.gov/data-brokers
.
Data brokers are subject to the CCPA. On the Data Broker Registry website, you will find contact information and a website link for each registered data broker, as well as additional information to help you exercise your CCPA rights.
3. How can I stop a data broker from selling my personal information?
You can click on the “View Full Submission” link on the
Data Broker Registry
to get instructions on how to opt-out of the sale of your personal information. However, you may not be able to stop the sale of all of your information. The CCPA’s definition of “personal information” does not include information lawfully made available from government records, which are often sources used by data brokers.
You can also go to a data broker’s website through the link posted on the Registry and find the broker’s privacy policy to learn more about its privacy practices and how to exercise your CCPA rights.
Back To Top
Other Consumer Resources on CCPA
California Privacy Protection Agency’s FAQ on the CCPA
Consumer-Action.org
Take action! Exercise your rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act
Back To Top
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) Home
CCPA Enforcement Case Examples
File a Complaint
CCPA Regulations
CCPA Opt-Out Icon
Preliminary Rulemaking Activities
Global Privacy Control (GPC)
Privacy and Data Security
Privacy and Data Security Home
Business Privacy Resources
California Consumer Privacy Act
Consumer Privacy Resources
Data Breaches
Identity Theft
Privacy Enforcement Actions
Report a Breach
Protecting Children Online
Resources for Law Enforcement
Special Protection
Data Brokers
Data Broker Listing
Original text
Rate this translation
Your feedback will be used to help improve Google Translate